Mississippi, session 2026, SB2541.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  (1) As used in this section, "over-the-counter medication" means medication that may be legally sold and purchased without a prescription. (2)  Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, ivermectin suitable for human use may be sold or purchased as an over-the-counter medication in this state without a prescription or consultation with a health care professional. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.